Florida, session 2026, SB1110.
Be It Enacted by the Legislature of the State of Florida: 28 29 Section 1.âSubsection (10) of section 409.906, Florida 30 Statutes, is amended to read: 31 409.906âOptional Medicaid services.âSubject to specific 32 appropriations, the agency may make payments for services which 33 are optional to the state under Title XIX of the Social Security 34 Act and are furnished by Medicaid providers to recipients who 35 are determined to be eligible on the dates on which the services 36 were provided. Any optional service that is provided shall be 37 provided only when medically necessary and in accordance with 38 state and federal law. Optional services rendered by providers 39 in mobile units to Medicaid recipients may be restricted or 40 prohibited by the agency. Nothing in this section shall be 41 construed to prevent or limit the agency from adjusting fees, 42 reimbursement rates, lengths of stay, number of visits, or 43 number of services, or making any other adjustments necessary to 44 comply with the availability of moneys and any limitations or 45 directions provided for in the General Appropriations Act or 46 chapter 216. If necessary to safeguard the stateâs systems of 47 providing services to elderly and disabled persons and subject 48 to the notice and review provisions of s. 216.177, the Governor 49 may direct the Agency for Health Care Administration to amend 50 the Medicaid state plan to delete the optional Medicaid service 51 known as âIntermediate Care Facilities for the Developmentally 52 Disabled.â Optional services may include: 53 (10)âDURABLE MEDICAL EQUIPMENT.â 54 (a)âThe agency may authorize and pay for certain durable 55 medical equipment and supplies provided to a Medicaid recipient 56 as medically necessary. 57 (b)1.âAs used in this paragraph, the term âeligible 58 individualâ means a Medicaid recipient who is: 59 a.âA child younger than 18 years of age; 60 b.âA dependent child as specified in s. 627.6562; 61 c.âAn individual 26 years of age or younger who remains 62 covered under a parentâs health insurance policy pursuant to s. 63 627.6562; or 64 d.âAn individual with a developmental disability as defined 65 in s. 393.063. 66 2.âThe agency may authorize and pay for all of the 67 following orthotics and prosthetics services for eligible 68 individuals: 69 a.âOrthoses and prostheses as those terms are defined in s. 70 468.80. Coverage must include payment for: 71 (I)âThe model of an orthosis or a prosthesis which is 72 deemed by the eligible individualâs provider to be the most 73 appropriate to meet the medical needs of the eligible individual 74 to perform activities of daily living and essential job-related 75 activities; and 76 (II)âWhen medically necessary, an orthosis or a prosthesis 77 designed for physical or recreational activities that maximize 78 the eligible individualâs full body health and lower and upper 79 limb function. 80 b.âAll materials and components necessary to use the 81 orthosis or prosthesis. 82 c.âInstruction on the use of the orthosis or prosthesis. 83 d.âAny necessary repairs or replacement of the orthosis or 84 prosthesis. 85 3.âThis paragraph may not be construed to require Medicaid 86 coverage of orthotics and prosthetics services specified herein 87 for a Medicaid recipient who is not an eligible individual. 88 Section 2.âThe Agency for Health Care Administration shall 89 seek federal approval and amend contracts as necessary to 90 implement the changes made to s. 409.906, Florida Statutes, by 91 this act. 92 Section 3.âSection 627.64085, Florida Statutes, is created 93 to read: 94 627.64085âOrthotics and prosthetics services.â 95 (1)âAs used in this section, the term âeligible individualâ 96 means an insured who is: 97 a.âA child younger than 18 years of age; 98 b.âA dependent child as specified in s. 627.6562; 99 c.âAn individual 26 years of age or younger who remains 100 covered under a parentâs health insurance policy pursuant to s. 101 627.6562; or 102 d.âAn individual with a developmental disability as defined 103 in s. 393.063. 104 (2)âA health insurance policy issued, amended, delivered, 105 or renewed in this state on or after July 1, 2026, must provide 106 coverage of all of the following for eligible individuals: 107 (a)âOrthoses and prostheses as those terms are defined in 108 s. 468.80 if the eligible individualâs provider determines that 109 an orthosis or a prosthesis is medically necessary for the 110 eligible individual to perform activities of daily living, 111 essential job-related activities, and physical recreational 112 activities, such as running, biking, swimming, strength 113 training, and other activities that maximize the eligible 114 individualâs full body health and lower and upper limb function. 115 (b)âAny replacement of the orthosis or prosthesis, or part 116 thereof, without regard to continuous use or useful lifetime 117 restrictions, if the eligible individualâs provider determines 118 that it is medically necessary due to any of the following: 119 1.âA change in the physiological condition of the eligible 120 individual. 121 2.âAn irreparable change in the condition of the orthosis 122 or prosthesis, or part thereof. 123 3.âA change in the condition of the orthosis or prosthesis, 124 or part thereof, requires repairs that would cost more than 60 125 percent of the cost of a replacement orthosis or prosthesis or 126 of the part thereof requiring replacement. 127 128 A health insurer may require supporting documentation from an 129 eligible individualâs provider to confirm the need for a 130 replacement for an orthosis or a prosthesis that is less than 3 131 years old. 132 (3)âA health insurer may not deny a claim for an orthosis 133 or a prosthesis as a medically necessary intervention to restore 134 physical function for an eligible individual with a disability 135 which would otherwise be covered for a nondisabled person 136 seeking medical or surgical intervention to restore or maintain 137 the ability to perform the same type of physical function 138 affected. 139 (4)âBeginning July 1, 2027, and annually thereafter, each 140 health insurer subject to this section shall submit a report to 141 the Office of Insurance Regulation detailing the total number of 142 claims submitted for orthotics and prosthetics services in the 143 previous plan year and the total number of such claims that were 144 paid, including the amount paid. 145 (5)âThis section may not be construed to require coverage 146 of orthotics or prosthetics services for an insured who is not 147 an eligible individual. 148 Section 4.âSection 627.6614, Florida Statutes, is created 149 to read: 150 627.6614âOrthotics and prosthetics services.â 151 (1)âAs used in this section, the term âeligible individualâ 152 means an insured who is: 153 a.âA child younger than 18 years of age; 154 b.âA dependent child as specified in s. 627.6562; 155 c.âAn individual 26 years of age or younger who remains 156 covered under a parentâs health insurance policy pursuant to s. 157 627.6562; or 158 d.âAn individual with a developmental disability as defined 159 in s. 393.063. 160 (2)âA group, blanket, or franchise health insurance policy 161 issued, amended, delivered, or renewed in this state on or after 162 July 1, 2026, must provide coverage of all of the following for 163 eligible individuals: 164 (a)âOrthoses and prostheses as those terms are defined in 165 s. 468.80 if the eligible individualâs provider determines that 166 an orthosis or a prosthesis is medically necessary for the 167 eligible individual to perform activities of daily living, 168 essential job-related activities, and physical recreational 169 activities, such as running, biking, swimming, strength 170 training, and other activities that maximize the eligible 171 individualâs full body health and lower and upper limb function. 172 (b)âAny replacement of the orthosis or prosthesis, or part 173 thereof, without regard to continuous use or useful lifetime 174 restrictions, if the eligible individualâs provider determines 175 that it is medically necessary due to any of the following: 176 1.âA change in the physiological condition of the eligible 177 individual. 178 2.âAn irreparable change in the condition of the orthosis 179 or prosthesis, or part thereof. 180 3.âA change in the condition of the orthosis or prosthesis, 181 or part thereof, requires repairs that would cost more than 60 182 percent of the cost of a replacement orthosis or prosthesis or 183 of the part thereof requiring replacement. 184 185 A health insurer may require supporting documentation from an 186 eligible individualâs provider to confirm the need for a 187 replacement for an orthosis or a prosthesis that is less than 3 188 years old. 189 (3)âA health insurer may not deny a claim for an orthosis 190 or a prosthesis as a medically necessary intervention to restore 191 physical function for an eligible individual with a disability 192 which would otherwise be covered for a nondisabled person 193 seeking medical or surgical intervention to restore or maintain 194 the ability to perform the same type of physical function 195 affected. 196 (4)âBeginning July 1, 2027, and annually thereafter, each 197 health insurer subject to this section shall submit a report to 198 the Office of Insurance Regulation detailing the total number of 199 claims submitted for orthotics and prosthetics services in the 200 previous plan year and the total number of such claims that were 201 paid, including the amount paid. 202 (5)âThis section may not be construed to require coverage 203 of orthotics or prosthetics services for an insured who is not 204 an eligible individual. 205 Section 5.âSection 641.31079, Florida Statutes, is created 206 to read: 207 641.31079âOrthotics and prosthetics services.â 208 (1)âAs used in this section, the term âeligible individualâ 209 means a subscriber who is: 210 a.âA child younger than 18 years of age; 211 b.âA dependent child as specified in s. 627.6562; 212 c.âAn individual 26 years of age or younger who remains 213 covered under a parentâs health insurance policy pursuant to s. 214 627.6562; or 215 d.âAn individual with a developmental disability as defined 216 in s. 393.063. 217 (2)âA health maintenance contract issued, amended, 218 delivered, or renewed in this state on or after July 1, 2026, 219 must provide coverage of all of the following for eligible 220 individuals: 221 (a)âOrthoses and prostheses as those terms are defined in 222 s. 468.80 if the eligible individualâs provider determines that 223 an orthosis or a prosthesis is medically necessary for the 224 eligible individual to perform activities of daily living, 225 essential job-related activities, and physical recreational 226 activities, such as running, biking, swimming, strength 227 training, and other activities that maximize the eligible 228 individualâs full body health and lower and upper limb function. 229 (b)âAny replacement of the orthosis or prosthesis, or part 230 thereof, without regard to continuous use or useful lifetime 231 restrictions, if the subscriberâs provider determines that it is 232 medically necessary due to any of the following: 233 1.âA change in the physiological condition of the eligible 234 individual. 235 2.âAn irreparable change in the condition of the orthosis 236 or prosthesis, or part thereof. 237 3.âA change in the condition of the orthosis or prosthesis, 238 or part thereof, requires repairs that would cost more than 60 239 percent of the cost of a replacement orthosis or prosthesis or 240 of the part thereof requiring replacement. 241 242 A health maintenance organization may require supporting 243 documentation from an eligible individualâs provider to confirm 244 the need for a replacement for an orthosis or a prosthesis that 245 is less than 3 years old. 246 (3)âA health maintenance organization may not deny a claim 247 for an orthosis or a prosthesis as a medically necessary 248 intervention to restore physical function for an eligible 249 individual with a disability which would otherwise be covered 250 for a nondisabled person seeking medical or surgical 251 intervention to restore or maintain the ability to perform the 252 same type of physical function affected. 253 (4)âBeginning July 1, 2027, and annually thereafter, each 254 health maintenance organization subject to this section shall 255 submit a report to the Office of Insurance Regulation detailing 256 the total number of claims submitted for orthotics and 257 prosthetics services in the previous plan year and the total 258 number of such claims that were paid, including the amount paid. 259 (5)âThis section may not be construed to require coverage 260 of orthotics or prosthetics services for a subscriber who is not 261 an eligible individual. 262 Section 6.âThis act shall take effect July 1, 2026.